California, session 20252026, SB434.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. It is the intent of the Legislature to clarify that residents of residential care facilities for the elderly have the same or greater legal protections as other tenants in the state.SEC. 2. Section 1569.683 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:1569.683. (a) In addition to complying with Section 1569.684 of this code, Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1940) of Title 5 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code, and other applicable regulations, a A licensee of a residential care facility for the elderly who sends a notice of eviction to a resident shall set forth in the notice to quit the reasons relied upon for the eviction, with specific facts to permit determination of the date, place, witnesses, and circumstances concerning those reasons. In addition, the notice to quit shall include all of the following:(1) The effective date of the eviction.(2) Documentation of the licensee’s reasonable efforts to create a safe discharge plan. The documentation shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following:(A) A list of the resident’s posteviction needs, goals, and preferences.(B) (i) A list of discharge locations that meet all of the following:(I) Are equipped to meet the needs of the resident.(II) Are financially practicable for the resident, including, but not limited to, facilities that are covered by the resident’s Medi-Cal managed care plan, if applicable.(III) Are within 30 60 miles of the resident’s preferred city.(ii) The list provided pursuant to this subparagraph shall specify the services provided at each location that meet the resident’s needs and each location’s state licensing status.(3) Information about the resident’s right to file a complaint with the department regarding the eviction, with the name, address, and telephone number of the nearest office of community care licensing and the State Ombudsman.(4) The following statement: “In order to evict a resident who remains in the facility after the effective date of the eviction, the residential care facility for the elderly must file an unlawful detainer action in superior court and receive a written judgment signed by a judge. If the facility pursues the unlawful detainer action, you must be served with a summons and complaint. You have the right to contest the eviction in writing and through a hearing.”(b) The licensee, in addition to either serving notice pursuant to Section 1569.684 or seeking approval from the department and serving three days’ notice on the resident, shall notify notify, or mail a copy of the notice to quit to, the resident’s responsible person.(c) The licensee shall send a copy of the notice to the local long-term care ombudsman at the same time notice is provided to the resident or the resident’s representative. The copy shall be sent by fax machine or email, as may be directed by the local long-term care ombudsman, unless the facility does not have fax or email capability, in which case the copy of the notice shall be sent by first-class mail.(d) A licensee shall not refuse entry to a resident or prohibit the resident from residing in the facility until the notice period described in subdivision (b) has elapsed and the eviction process has concluded. A licensee that refuses entry to a resident in violation of this section is subject to a civil penalty of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) and an additional penalty of one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each day the licensee refuses entry to the resident. Notwithstanding Section 1569.40, a licensee that refuses entry to a resident in violation of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor. SEC. 3. Section 1569.684 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:1569.684. Except when a licensee has approval from the department to serve three days’ notice of eviction on a resident, a notice of eviction shall be provided as follows:(a) For those who will have resided in the facility for less than one year as of the effective date of the eviction, or who are being evicted for nonpayment of the rate for basic services within 10 days of the due date, no less than 30 days’ notice. (b) For those who will have resided in the facility for one year or more, but less than two years, as of the effective date of the eviction, no less than 60 days’ notice.(c) For those who will have resided in the facility for two years or more as of the effective date of the eviction, no less than 90 days’ notice.SEC. 4. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.